Arkansas, session 2025, HB1200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - SHARED SERVICES. There is hereby
established for the Department of Energy and Environment for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) SC005 SECRETARY OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENT 1 GRADE SE05
(2) N218N E&E CHIEF ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE SE02
(3) N257N E & E EXECUTIVE CHIEF OF STAFF 1 GRADE SE01
(4) D129C E&E DIRECTOR OF INFORMATION TECH 1 GRADE IT10
(5) G298C E & E CHIEF COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS15
*WFP016*
04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200
(6) N230N E&E CHIEF OF STAFF 1 GRADE GS15
(7) N205N E&E DIRECTOR OF COMPLIANCE 1 GRADE GS13
(8) N204N E&E DIRECTOR OF SPECIAL PROJECTS 1 GRADE GS13
(9) G019C GENERAL COUNSEL 3 GRADE GS13
(10) G004C MANAGING ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS13
(11) G035C ADEQ ADMINISTRATION DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(12) G025C ATTORNEY SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS12
(13) G024C DEPARTMENT ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE 1 GRADE GS12
(14) P079C E&E CHIEF OF COMMUNICATIONS 1 GRADE GS12
(15) G028C E&E TECHNICAL OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(16) A014C FISCAL DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(17) A031C ASSISTANT CONTROLLER 1 GRADE GS11
(18) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 5 GRADE GS11
(19) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(20) A044C AUDIT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS10
(21) B037C CHEMIST SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS09
(22) A038C FISCAL SUPPORT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(23) R021C BUDGET ANALYST 1 GRADE GS08
(24) G139C E&E FACILITY SUPPORT SVCS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(25) G093C OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(26) A089C ACCOUNTANT I 2 GRADE GS07
(27) X054C ENVIRONMENTAL PROGRAM COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS07
(28) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(29) A075C FINANCIAL ANALYST I 1 GRADE GS07
(30) B051C GEOLOGIST 1 GRADE GS07
(31) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(32) P013C PUBLIC INFORMATION COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS07
(33) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(34) S024C CONSTRUCTION/MAINTENANCE COORD 1 GRADE GS06
(35) X082C E&E INSPECTOR II 1 GRADE GS06
(36) P049C GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 GRADE GS06
(37) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(38) G179C LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 5 GRADE GS06
(39) P027C PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(40) C050C ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS05
(41) S025C BUILDING AND GROUNDS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS05
04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200
(42) A090C PAYROLL SERVICES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(43) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 2 GRADE GS04
(44) R036C HUMAN RESOURCES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(45) S046C MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN 4 GRADE GS04
(46) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 1 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 64

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - SHARED SERVICES PAYING ACCOUNT. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be
payable from the paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Energy and Environment for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $4,273,710
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,495,471
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,250,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 85,000
(C) PROF. FEES 450,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 250,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $7,804,181

SECTION 3. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental Quality for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U015U DEQ DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE03
(2) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 1 GRADE IT08
04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200
(3) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 3 GRADE IT07
(4) D039C NETWORK SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT06
(5) D063C COMPUTER SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT05
(6) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 7 GRADE IT05
(7) D068C INFORMATION SYSTEMS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT04
(8) D065C NETWORK SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT04
(9) D064C WEBSITE DEVELOPER 1 GRADE IT04
(10) N195N DEQ ASSOCIATE DIRECTOR 3 GRADE GS15
(11) N180N E&E ASSOCIATE DIRECTOR ENERGY 1 GRADE GS14
(12) B146C E&E PROF ENGINEER SENIOR MANAGER 3 GRADE GS13
(13) B012C E&E SENIOR MANAGER 4 GRADE GS13
(14) B151C AIR QUALITY MODELER 1 GRADE GS12
(15) G025C ATTORNEY SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS12
(16) G032C E&E ENERGY OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(17) B142C E&E ENVIRONMENTAL OPERATIONS MANAGER 4 GRADE GS12
(18) B015C ENGINEER SUPERVISOR 11 GRADE GS12
(19) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS11
(20) N203N E&E DIRECTOR OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES 1 GRADE GS11
(21) A021N E&E ENERGY FISCAL OFFICER 1 GRADE GS11
(22) G013C E&E ENERGY PROGRAM MANAGER 2 GRADE GS11
(23) B023C ENGINEER, P.E. 15 GRADE GS11
(24) G063C E&E BRANCH MANAGER 17 GRADE GS10
(25) L099C EPIDEMIOLOGY SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS10
(26) A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(27) B037C CHEMIST SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS09
(28) B042C ENGINEER 25 GRADE GS09
(29) L028C EPIDEMIOLOGIST 5 GRADE GS09
(30) B035C GEOLOGY SUPERVISOR 3 GRADE GS09
(31) G109C GRANTS MANAGER 3 GRADE GS09
(32) P004C PUBLIC INFORMATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(33) B055C ECOLOGIST COORDINATOR 3 GRADE GS08
(34) B043C PROFESSIONAL GEOLOGIST 16 GRADE GS08
(35) E023C TRAINING PROJECT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(36) B081C CHEMIST 8 GRADE GS07
(37) G159C DEPARTMENT BUSINESS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(38) X059C E&E COMPLIANCE COORDINATOR 5 GRADE GS07
04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200
(39) X036C E&E INSPECTOR SUPERVISOR I 14 GRADE GS07
(40) B065C ECOLOGIST 7 GRADE GS07
(41) G248C ENERGY PROGRAM COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS07
(42) X054C ENVIRONMENTAL PROGRAM COORDINATOR 22 GRADE GS07
(43) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(44) A075C FINANCIAL ANALYST I 2 GRADE GS07
(45) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 3 GRADE GS07
(46) P020C PRODUCTION ARTIST 1 GRADE GS07
(47) P013C PUBLIC INFORMATION COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(48) A072C RESEARCH & STATISTICS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(49) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 19 GRADE GS06
(50) R027C BUDGET SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(51) X075C E&E COMPLIANCE ANALYST 14 GRADE GS06
(52) X093C E&E INSPECTOR II 74 GRADE GS06
(53) G180C GRANTS ANALYST 6 GRADE GS06
(54) G178C POLICY DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS06
(55) P027C PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(56) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 18 GRADE GS04
(57) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 1 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 348

SECTION 4. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Department
of Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental Quality for the 2025-
2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: seventy (70) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be payable from
the Division of Environmental Quality Fund Account, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Energy and Environment - Division of
Environmental Quality - State Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:
04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $2,278,483
(02) EXTRA HELP 25,674
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 817,949
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 403,183
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 32,115
(C) PROF. FEES 79,100
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,636,504

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - FEDERAL OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be payable from
the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Energy and
Environment - Division of Environmental Quality - Federal Operations for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $5,730,066
(02) EXTRA HELP 148,585
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 3,197,378
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,364,398
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 372,173
(C) PROF. FEES 1,521,755
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 1,148,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) DIESEL EMISSION REDUCTION AWARD GRANTS 2,766,000
(06) INDIRECT COSTS 586,157
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $16,834,512

04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200
SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - WASTE WATER LICENSING PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be
payable from the Wastewater Licensing Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Energy and Environment - Division of
Environmental Quality - Waste Water Licensing Program for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $94,758
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 44,448
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 76,721
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 5,000
(C) PROF. FEES 100,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $320,927

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - LAND RECLAMATION PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be payable from
the Land Reclamation Fund, for land reclamation contracts of the Department
of Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental Quality - Land
Reclamation Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) RECLAMATION CONTRACTS $400,000

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - HAZARDOUS WASTE PERMIT PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be
payable from the Hazardous Waste Permit Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Energy and Environment - Division of
Environmental Quality - Hazardous Waste Permit Program for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $914,172
(02) EXTRA HELP 15,795
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 349,544
(04) OVERTIME 1,250
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 140,544
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 10,700
(C) PROF. FEES 10,150
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 175,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,617,155

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - RECLAMATION OF ABANDONED MINES PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to
be payable from the Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund, for contractual services
of the Department of Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental
Quality - Reclamation of Abandoned Mines Program for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ABANDONED MINE RECLAMATION
CONTRACTUAL SERVICES $5,700,000

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - SURFACE COAL MINING PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be
payable from the Surface Coal Mining Operation Fund, for operating expenses
of the Department of Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental
Quality - Surface Coal Mining Program for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $15,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $15,000

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - MINING RECLAMATION PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be
payable from the Mine Reclamation Trust Fund, for contractual services of the
Department of Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental Quality -
Mining Reclamation Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MINING RECLAMATION CONTRACTUAL
SERVICES $1,520,000

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - FEE ADMINISTRATION. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be payable from
the Division of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Energy and Environment - Division
of Environmental Quality - Fee Administration for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $8,033,237
(02) EXTRA HELP 45,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 3,016,630
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 2,395,641
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 175,516
(C) PROF. FEES 600,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 1,050,000
04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) DIESEL EMISSION REDUCTION AWARDS
GRANTS 1,079,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $16,395,024

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - SOLID WASTE PERFORMANCE BONDS PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to
be payable from the Solid Waste Performance Bond Fund, for contractual
services of the Department of Energy and Environment - Division of
Environmental Quality - Solid Waste Performance Bonds Program for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SOLID WASTE PERFORMANCE BONDS
CONTRACTUAL SERVICES $2,000,000

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - HAZARDOUS WASTE CLEANUP PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be
payable from the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund, for personal
services and operating expenses of the Department of Energy and Environment -
Division of Environmental Quality - Hazardous Waste Cleanup Program for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $347,555
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 123,381
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 302,191
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 35,960
(C) PROF. FEES 215,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) CONTRACTUAL SERVICES 6,194,000
(05) DATA PROCESSING PURCHASES 453,937
04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $7,672,024

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - EMERGENCY RESPONSE PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be
payable from the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund, for
contractual services of the Department of Energy and Environment - Division
of Environmental Quality - Emergency Response Program for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CONTRACTUAL SERVICES $372,655

SECTION 17. APPROPRIATION - ASBESTOS CONTROL PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be payable from
the Asbestos Control Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Department of Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental Quality
- Asbestos Control Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $199,684
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 76,787
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 54,452
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 4,090
(C) PROF. FEES 27,100
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) ASBESTOS CONTROL PROGRAM GRANTS 150,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $512,113

SECTION 18. APPROPRIATION - SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT AND RECYCLING
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and
Environment, to be payable from the Solid Waste Management and Recycling
04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200
Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental Quality - Solid Waste
Management and Recycling Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $783,661
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 294,851
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 172,179
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 15,668
(C) PROF. FEES 50,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 100,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 4,650,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $6,066,359

SECTION 19. APPROPRIATION - REGULATED SUBSTANCE STORAGE TANK PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to
be payable from the Regulated Substance Storage Tank Program Fund, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Energy and
Environment - Division of Environmental Quality - Regulated Substance Storage
Tank Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $864,655
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 334,112
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 121,128
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 5,005
(C) PROF. FEES 50,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,374,900
04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200

SECTION 20. APPROPRIATION - PETROLEUM STORAGE TANK TRUST FUND PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to
be payable from the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Energy and Environment - Division
of Environmental Quality - Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund Program for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $440,556
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 159,076
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 18,999,800
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 3,005
(C) PROF. FEES 2,500,156
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $22,102,593

SECTION 21. APPROPRIATION - REGULATED STORAGE TANK PROGRAM - FEDERAL
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and
Environment, to be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services, operating expenses, and
contractual services of the Department of Energy and Environment - Division
of Environmental Quality - Regulated Storage Tank Program - Federal
Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULATED STORAGE TANK PROGRAM $1,500,000

SECTION 22. APPROPRIATION - LANDFILL POST-CLOSURE PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be
payable from the Landfill Post-Closure Trust Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Energy and Environment - Division of
04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200
Environmental Quality - Landfill Post-Closure Program for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $228,880
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 83,574
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 30,923
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 6,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) CONTRACTUAL SERVICES 14,109,373
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $14,458,750

SECTION 23. APPROPRIATION - MARKETING RECYCLABLES PROGRAM OF THE
COMPLIANCE ADVISORY PANEL. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department
of Energy and Environment, to be payable from the Marketing Recyclables
Program Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department
of Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental Quality - Marketing
Recyclables Program of the Compliance Advisory Panel for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,500
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 115
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 13,296
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 6,415
(C) PROF. FEES 7,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $28,326

04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200
SECTION 24. APPROPRIATION - ENVIRONMENTAL EDUCATION PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be
payable from the Environmental Education Fund, for operating expenses of the
Department of Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental Quality -
Environmental Education Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $111,300
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 8,000
(C) PROF. FEES 26,700
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $146,000

SECTION 25. APPROPRIATION - PERFORMANCE PARTNERSHIP SYSTEM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be
payable from the Performance Partnership Trust Fund, for expenses of
designing and establishing a management organization of the Department of
Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental Quality - Performance
Partnership System for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PERFORMANCE INTEGRATED INFORMATION
SYSTEM EXPENSES $563,000

SECTION 26. APPROPRIATION - ENVIRONMENTAL SETTLEMENT TRUST PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to
be payable from the Environmental Settlement Trust Fund, for expenses as
authorized through various settlement agreements benefiting the State of
Arkansas as administered through the Department of Energy and Environment -
Division of Environmental Quality - Environmental Settlement Trust Program
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ENVIRONMENTAL SETTLEMENT TRUST
EXPENSES $850,000

SECTION 27. REGULAR SALARIES - POLLUTION CONTROL AND ECOLOGY COMMISSION
- ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING OFFICER. There is hereby established for the
Department of Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental Quality for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) G032N PC&E HEARING OFFICER 1 GRADE GS14
(2) G179C LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 2

SECTION 28. APPROPRIATION - POLLUTION CONTROL AND ECOLOGY COMMISSION -
ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING OFFICER. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Energy and Environment, to be payable from the Division of
Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Energy and Environment - Division of
Environmental Quality - Pollution Control and Ecology Commission -
Administrative Hearing Officer for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $189,600
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 57,958
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 49,217
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 6,922
(C) PROF. FEES 38,000
04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $341,697

SECTION 29. APPROPRIATION - NON HAZARDOUS SITE CLEANUP PROGRAM. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be
payable from the Division of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund, for the
cleanup of non-hazardous sites which pose a threat to the environment by the
Department of Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental Quality -
Non Hazardous Site Cleanup Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CONTRACTUAL SERVICES $100,000

SECTION 30. APPROPRIATION - WATER PERFORMANCE BOND FUND PROGRAM. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be
payable from the Water Performance Bond Fund, for contractual services of the
Department of Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental Quality -
Water Performance Bond Fund Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) NONMUNICIPAL DOMESTIC SEWAGE
CONTRACTUAL SERVICES $500,000

SECTION 31. APPROPRIATION - NONMUNICIPAL DOMESTIC SEWAGE TREATMENT
WORKS PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and
Environment, to be payable from the Nonmunicipal Domestic Sewage Treatment
Works Trust Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Department of Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental Quality -
Nonmunicipal Domestic Sewage Treatment Works Program for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) NONMUNICIPAL DOMESTIC SEWAGE TREATMENT $55,000

SECTION 32. APPROPRIATION - USED TIRE RECYCLING AND ACCOUNTABILITY
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and
Environment, to be payable from the Used Tire Recycling Fund, for expenses of
the Department of Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental Quality
- Used Tire Recycling and Accountability Program for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) USED TIRE RECYCLING AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM EXPENSES $10,788,000

SECTION 33. APPROPRIATION - USED TIRE RECYCLING AND ABATEMENT - CASH. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be
payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for expenses of the Department of
Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental Quality - Used Tire
Recycling and Abatement - Cash for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) USED TIRE RECYCLING AND ABATEMENT $5,000,000

SECTION 34. APPROPRIATION - STATE ENERGY PLAN - FEDERAL OPERATIONS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to
be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State, for personal services, operating expenses, and grants and aid
of the Department of Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental
Quality - State Energy Plan - Federal Operations for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $226,898
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 83,115
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 118,273
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 36,788
(C) PROF. FEES 268,085
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) ENERGY CONSERVATION GRANTS AND AID 551,952
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,285,111

SECTION 35. APPROPRIATION - ENERGY OFFICE - FEDERAL OPERATIONS. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be
payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for personal services, operating expenses, and grants and aid of
the Department of Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental Quality
- Energy Office - Federal Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $629,544
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 244,666
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 67,880
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 16,750
(C) PROF. FEES 13,500
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) LIHEAP GRANTS 33,108,910
(05) DATA PROCESSING SERVICES 25,046
(06) WEATHERIZATION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM 7,561,541
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $41,667,837

04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200
SECTION 36. APPROPRIATION - ENERGY PERFORMANCE CONTRACTS PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to
be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined
by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the
Department of Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental Quality -
Energy Performance Contracts Program for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $25,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 300,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $325,000

SECTION 37. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. EQUIPMENT
PURCHASE RESTRICTIONS. Expenditures from the Hazardous Substance Remedial
Action Trust Fund for the purchase of division laboratory equipment,
including maintenance contracts, data processing equipment and mission-
critical software, including maintenance contracts, as appropriated in the
Capital Outlay and Data Processing Purchases line items of the Hazardous
Waste Cleanup Program appropriation section, may be funded through interest
earnings, investment earnings, and no more than three percent (3%) of the
corpus of the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund and additional
funding from the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund on July 1,
2024 2025. Further, the Division shall report annually to the Arkansas
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee all expenditures for these
purchases.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 38. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. FUND
TRANSFER PROVISION. Upon approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State,
the Arkansas Division of Environmental Quality may transfer from various
department funds to the Division of Environmental Quality Fund Account the
sum of $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the exclusive
purpose of supplementing funding for the appropriation provided in the State
Operations appropriation section. The funds shall be used for personal
services and operating expenses of the Arkansas Division of Environmental
Quality - State Operations. Funds which remain in the Division of
Environmental Quality Fund Account at the close of the fiscal year shall be
carried forward and made available for the same purpose for the following
fiscal year. These funds shall be used for the purpose stated above.
The amounts transferred shall not be considered as part of any
statutory limitation on the use of funds for administration of programs of
the Division.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 39. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. LANDFILL
POST-CLOSURE CLEAN UP RESTRICTIONS. Any expenditures in excess of $2,000,000
per site from the Landfill Post-Closure Trust Fund, as appropriated in the
Contractual Services line item of the Landfill Post-Closure Program
appropriation section, for corrective action to remedy environmental impacts
of closed disposal sites previously operated as a landfill pursuant to state
law, shall be subject to review and approval by the Arkansas Pollution
Control and Ecology Commission after addressing corrective actions needed to
address environmental impacts from permitted landfills closed properly.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 40. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SHARED
SERVICES. (a)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create a Shared
Services paying accounts on his or her books and on the books of the
Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal
04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200
services and operating expenses in the Shared Services Paying Account
Appropriation by the Department of Energy and Environment.
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer
of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account
appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(3) The transfer authority provided to the department in
subdivision (a)(2) of this section may be used to make transfers only within
the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts
authorized for the department.
(4) The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the date of
passage through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 41. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 42. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 43. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1200
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee



























04-01-2025 16:17:31 WFP016